Ohio, session 136, HB539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.2324 of the Revised Code be 3
enacted to read as follows: 4
Sec. 5.2324. The fourth day of February is designated as 5
Thaddeus Kościuszko Day, in honor of the Polish general, 6
military engineer, and hero of the American revolutionary war, 7
who was born on that day in 1746, and who was described by 8
Thomas Jefferson, "as pure a son of liberty, as I have ever 9
known." 10